Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-521
Judgments; installment payments.

A judgment debtor upon due notice to the judgment creditor may apply to the court in which such judgment was rendered for the privilege of paying such judgment in installments and the court, in its discretion and without prejudice to any other legal remedies which the judgment creditor may have, may so order and fix the amounts and times of payment of the installments.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 21, p. 492.